Utah statutes.
19-1-406.   Retrofit compressed natural gas vehicles -- Inspections, standards, and certification -- Compliance with other law -- Programs to coordinate.

(1)  An owner of a retrofit compressed natural gas vehicle that is retrofit on or after July 1, 2010, may not operate the retrofit compressed natural gas vehicle before the owner has the retrofit compressed natural gas vehicle:

(a)  inspected and certified as safe in accordance with relevant standards, including the National Fire Protection Association 52 Vehicular Gaseous Fuel Systems Code, by a CSA America CNG Fuel System Inspector; and

(b)  tested to ensure that the retrofit compressed natural gas vehicle satisfies the emissions standards:

(i)  if any, for the county in which the retrofit compressed natural gas vehicle is registered; or

(ii)  for the county in the state with the most lenient emissions standards, if the retrofit compressed natural gas vehicle is registered in a county with no emissions standards.

(2)  A person who performs a retrofit on a retrofit compressed natural gas vehicle shall certify to the owner of the retrofit compressed natural gas vehicle that the retrofit does not tamper with, circumvent, or otherwise affect the vehicle's on-board diagnostic system, if any.

(3) (a)  After the owner of a retrofit compressed natural gas vehicle that is retrofit on or after July 1, 2010, has the retrofit compressed natural gas vehicle inspected under Subsection (1), the owner shall have the retrofit inspected for safety by a CSA America CNG Fuel System Inspector:

(i)  the sooner of:

(A)  every three years after the retrofit; or

(B)  every 36,000 miles after the retrofit; and

(ii)  after any collision occurring at a speed of greater than five miles per hour.

(b)  An inspector at a state-required safety inspection shall verify that a retrofit compressed natural gas vehicle is inspected in accordance with Subsection (3)(a).

(4) (a)  The Division of Air Quality may develop programs to coordinate amongst government agencies and interested parties in the private sector to facilitate:

(i)  testing to ensure compliance with emissions and anti-tampering standards established in this section or by federal law; and

(ii)  the retrofitting of vehicles to operate on compressed natural gas vehicles in a manner that provides for:

(A)  safety;

(B)  compliance with applicable law; and

(C)  potential improvement in the air quality of this state.

(b)  In developing a program under this Subsection (4), the Division of Air Quality shall:

(i)  allow for testing using equipment widely available within the state, if possible; and

(ii)  consult with relevant federal, state, and local government agencies and other interested parties.



Enacted by Chapter 236, 2010 General Session

